src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-A-I-apotaki_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - á'po'taki - ok : # -m animate intransitive verb, work AEW NA1
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nitá'páo'taki
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kitá'páo'taki
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: á'páo'takiwa
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+4Sg: á'páo'takiyini
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+21Pl: á'páo'takio'pa
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: nitá'páo'takihpinnaana
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: kitohkaná'páo'takihpoaawa
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+PRO+3/0: á'páo'takiyaawa
     
     Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nitáaká'po'taki
     Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kitáaká'po'taki
     Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áaká'po'takiwa
     Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+4Sg: áaká'po'takiyini
     Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+21Pl: áaká'po'takio'pa
     Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: nitáaká'po'takihpinnaana
     Fut+PV/ohkan+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: kitáakohkaná'po'takihpoaawa
     Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+PRO+3/0: áaká'po'takiyaawa
 
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nitá'po'taki
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kitá'po'taki
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: á'po'takiwa
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+4Sg: á'po'takiyini
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+21Pl: á'po'takio'pa
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: nitá'po'takihpinnaana
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: kitá'po'takihpoaawa
     a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+PRO+3/0: á'po'takiyaawa
     
     Neg+Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg+INTERR: nimáátá'páo'takihpa
     Neg+Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg+INTERR: kimáátá'páo'takihpa
     Neg+Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: máátá'páo'takiwa
     Neg+Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: nimáátá'páo'takihpinnaana
     Neg+Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Pl+INTERR: máátá'páo'takiwaiksaawayi
     
     Neg+Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg+INTERR: nimáátáaká'po'takihpa
     Neg+Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg+INTERR: kimáátáaká'po'takihpa
     Neg+Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: máátaaká'po'takiwa
     Neg+Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+21Pl: máátáaká'po'takio'pa
     Neg+Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: kimáátáaká'po'takihpoaawa
     Neg+Fut+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Pl+INTERR: máátáaká'po'takiwaiksaawayi
     
     Neg+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Sg+INTERR: nimáátá'po'takihpa
     Neg+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg+INTERR: kimáátá'po'takihpa
     Neg+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg+INTERR: máátá'po'takiwatsiksiwa
     Neg+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+1Pl: nimáátá'po'takihpinnaana
     Neg+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Pl+INTERR: máátá'po'takiwaiksaawayi
    
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+1Sg: nita'páo'takssi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+2Sg: kita'páo'takssi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+3Sg: ota'páo'takssi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+4Sg: a'páo'takssi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+1Pl: nita'páo'takssinnaana
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+21Pl: a'páo'takssi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+2Pl: kita'páo'takssoaayi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+3Pl: ota'páo'takssi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Cnj+4Pl: a'páo'takssi
   
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+1Sg: a'páo'takiniki
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+2Sg: a'páo'takiniki
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+3Sg: a'páo'takisi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+4Sg: a'páo'takisi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+1Pl: a'páo'takinnaaniki
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+21Pl: a'páo'takinoainiki
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+2Pl: a'páo'takio'ki
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+3Pl: a'páo'takisi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Sbj+4Pl: a'páo'takisi

     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+1Sg: nita'páo'takihtopi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+2Sg: kita'páo'takihtopi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+3Sg: a'páo'takiwahtopi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+4Sg: a'páo'takiwahtopini
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+1Pl: nita'páo'takihpinnaanopi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+21Pl: a'páo'takihpoaawopi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+2Pl: kita'páo'takiwahtopiyi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+3Pl: a'páo'takiwahtopiyi
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Irr+4Pl: a'páo'takiwahtopiyini
  
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Imp+2Sg: a'páo'takit
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Imp+2Pl: a'páo'takik
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kitá'páo'taki
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+3Sg: á'páo'takiwa
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+4Sg: á'páo'takiyini
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+21Pl: á'páo'takio'pa
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: nitá'páo'takihpinnaana
     PV/ohkan+Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+2Pl: kitohkaná'páo'takihpoaawa
     Dur+a'po'taki+VAI+Ind+PRO+3/0: á'páo'takiyaawa
